District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.02

Licensing needed to transact business.

No person, other than a domestic, foreign, or non-U.S. title insurer organized on the stock plan and licensed under Chapter 25 of this title [§ 31-2501.01 et seq.], shall issue a title insurance policy or otherwise transact the business of title insurance in the District.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2143, 57 DCR 6242

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2143 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation